Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3301
Sections; how interpreted.

Sections 44-3301 to 44-3327 shall be interpreted liberally to (1) encourage the development of more effective and economical ways of providing legal services, (2) ease the burden of necessary legal expenses, and (3) aid in maintaining a high level of competence and adherence to professional standards in the performance of legal services.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 1.